Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-116 Conflict with other laws. All
laws and parts of laws of this State inconsistent with this article are hereby
superseded with respect to matters covered by this article. [L 1987, c 349, pt
of §8]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next